District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.09

Criminal action.

A person who willfully violates § 8-111.04 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $5,000 for the 1st offense or $10,000 for the 2nd or subsequent offense, imprisoned for not more than 1 year, or both. Each day that a violation continues is a separate violation under this subchapter. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 10, 37 DCR 1641
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(a), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
1981 Ed., § 6-991.9.